Hawaii, session 2026, GM1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 286-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (e) to read:
"(e) Upon application for a certificate of inspection to
be issued for a vehicle or moped, an inspection as prescribed by
the director under subsection (g) shall be conducted on the
vehicle or moped. [i^] A certificate of inspection shall be
issued upon payment of a fee to be determined by the director if
the vehicle or moped is found to be in safe operating condition,
including [adhering to head lamp requiromonto and opocifi-cations
pursuant to oection 291-25 (a)/—as—appiieateieT—and is not] 2.
(1) Not being equipped with a muffler or exhaust system
that fails to comply with section 291-24 or 291-24.5,
as applicable [7—a—eer^fe-i^ireatre—af—inspeetien—sha-l-t-be
ios-Hcd upen-^ayffteap—ef—a—foo to be—dotorminod by the
director.];
2026-1732 HB1510 SDl SMA.docx

Page 2
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
(2) Adheriji2 t^head lamg^.e2ui£einerits ai2^s£eciflcationB
pursuant to section 291-25(a), as applicable; and
(3) Not being equipped with any cover or shield installed
over the license plate pursuant to section 286-73, as
applicable.
The certificate shall state the effective date, termination
date, name of the issuing insurance carrier, policy number of
the motor vehicle insurance identification card for the
inspected motor vehicle as specified by section 431:100-107 or
state the information contained in the proof of insurance card
as specified by section 431:100-106, and the odometer reading of
the vehicle on the date of inspection. A sticker, authorized by
the director, shall be affixed to the vehicle or moped at the
time a certificate of inspection is issued. An inspection
sticker that has been lost, stolen, or destroyed shall be
replaced without reinspection by the inspection station that
issued the original inspection sticker upon presentation of the
current certificate of inspection; provided that the current
certificate of inspection and inspection sticker shall not have
expired at the time the replacement is requested. The director
2026-1732 HB1510 SDl SMA.docx 2
lillinillllHnilHIIIHHH

Page 3
H.B. NO.
shall adopt rules to determine the fee for replacement of lost,
stolen, or destroyed inspection stickers."
2. By amending subsection (g) to read:
"(g) The director of transportation shall adopt necessary
rules for the administration of inspections and the issuance of
certificates of inspection; provided that the rules shall [-4-], at
a minimum:
(1) [At a minimum,—requirge] Require inspections to ensure
that a vehicle or moped is not equipped with a muffler
or exhaust system that fails to comply with section
291-24 or 291-24.5, as applicable; [and]
(2) Include head lamp requirements that adhere to the
specifications pursuant to section 291-25(a), as
applicable [-7-] ; and
(3) Require inspections to ensure that a vehicle is not
equipped with any cover or shield installed over the
l i£ense£la±a£ursuant^t^sectdon 2^62;23^"
SECTION 2. Section 286-73, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-(]§286-73 [■]-] Obstruction of a license plate; prohibited.
The use of any cover or shield installed over a vehicle's
2026-1732 HB1510 SDl SMA.docx
■■■miiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiffliMiii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
^2
S.D. 1
license plate, regardless of transparency or intent, shall be
prohibited.
(b) Any person, seller, or dealership who violates this
section shall be fined no less than [$500 and no more than]
$1,000 for each offense. Each day of violation shall constitute
a separate offense.
(c) In addition to any person authorized to enforce this
chapter, any person authorized by the State or a county to
enforce parking violations, including any person authorized by a
state or county law enforcement agency, may issue a citation for
a violation of this section.
(d) For the purposes of this section, "cover" or "shield"
means any device, material, or [film—whether] film, whether
clear, tinted, mirrored, reflective, or otherwise^ that is
installed over or affixed to a license plate [7—and io -intended
to alter or intorfc-rc with the vioibility,—legibility,—as-
af-^fehe—l-teeft&e-^iat-e—by-^raw—eft^at^eement—ee?
tra-f'f^te enforecment oyotemo] . "
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-1-732 HB1510 SDl SMA.docx 4
iiiiiiiiaiiiiiiiHiiiiiiHi

Page 5
H.B. NO.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
2026-1732 HB1510 SDl SMA.docx 5
iinnwiHMiiiniinnM^^^

1510
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1510, HD 2, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1510, H.D. 2, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 10, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3655